apertium-eo-en.eo.dix.xml
<pardef n="i__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>itaj</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>itan</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>itajn</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>itaj</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ata</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ataj</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>atan</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>atajn</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ite</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ate</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<!--
<e>                           <p><l>onta</l>                <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ontaj</l>               <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
-->
<!--
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>ante</l>                <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>anta</l>                <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
-->
  <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
<!--
<e>                           <p><l>inta</l>                <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>intaj</l>               <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
-->
  <e>       <p><l>anta</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e       ><p><l>anta</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>anta</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="ND"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e       ><p><l>antaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e       ><p><l>antan</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>antan</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="ND"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e       ><p><l>antajn</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>anta</l>      <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>anta</l>      <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="ND"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>antaj</l>     <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>antan</l>     <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>antan</l>     <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="ND"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>antajn</l>    <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ante</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>intaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>intan</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>intajn</l>    <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>inte</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Barcelono__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nomacc"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>-a</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="np"/><s n="top"/></r></p><par n="sgplnomacc"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Barcelon/o__np">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nomacc"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>a</l>         <r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="np"/><s n="top"/></r></p><par n="sgplnomacc"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Afgan/io__np">
  <e>       <p><l>io</l>        <r>io<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nomacc"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ujo</l>       <r>io<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nomacc"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ia</l>        <r>io<s n="adj"/><s n="np"/><s n="top"/></r></p><par n="sgplnomacc"/></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="Andoj__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="nomacc"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="np"/><s n="top"/></r></p><par n="sgplnomacc"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="Maria__np">
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nomacc"/></e>
<!-- Se estas genraj indikoj, ni fajfas -->
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nomacc"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nomacc"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Mark/o__np">
  <e r="RL"><p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nomacc"/></e>
<!-- Se estas genraj indikoj, ni fajfas -->
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nomacc"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nomacc"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="proper_names">
  <e>       <re>(St|s\-ro|s\-ino|f\-ino|d\-ro|Sir|Lord|Rt Hon|Mr|Miss|Ms|Mrs|Dr|Don).? ([A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-z]*)</re><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nomacc0"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="James__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nomacc0"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Mark__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nomacc0"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Mary__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nomacc0"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="Ifans__np">
<!-- Jacob 7sept 2009. En direkto eo->en ni provizore sopozu ke estas nominativo -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="Smith__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oj</l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojn</l>       <r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="Linux__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/></r></p><par n="sgplnomacc0"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="Virginia">             <i>Virginia</i><par n="Barcelono__np"/></e>
<e lm="Andoj">           <i>Andoj</i><par n="Andoj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Belgio">          <i>Belg</i><par n="Afgan/io__np"/></e>
<e lm="Danubo">          <i>Danub</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Filipinoj">       <i>Filipinoj</i><par n="Andoj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Francio">         <i>Franc</i><par n="Afgan/io__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kanarioj">        <i>Kanarioj</i><par n="Andoj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kipro">           <i>Kipr</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Nikaragvo">       <i>Nikaragv</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Normandio">       <i>Normand</i><par n="Afgan/io__np"/></e>
<e lm="Tajvano">         <i>Tajvan</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Flandrio">        <i>Flandr</i><par n="Afgan/io__np"/></e>
<e lm="konsumi">         <i>konsum</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="konatiĝi">        <i>konatiĝ</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="Eliza">           <i>Eliza</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Emilio">          <i>Emili</i><par n="Mark/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Helena">          <i>Helena</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Johano">          <i>Johan</i><par n="Mark/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Julia">           <i>Julia</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Laŭrenco">        <i>La</i><par n="ŭ"/><i>renc</i><par n="Mark/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Marta">           <i>Marta</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Petro">           <i>Petr</i><par n="Mark/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Zapatista Armeo de Nacia Liberiĝo"><i>Zapatista<b/>Armeo<b/>de<b/>Nacia<b/>Liberi</i><par n="ĝ"/><i>o</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
<e lm="aŭskultumi">      <i>a</i><par n="ŭ"/><i>skultum</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="Kaŭkazia">        <i>Ka</i><par n="ŭ"/><i>kazia</i><par n="Barcelono__np"/></e>
<e lm="Cork">            <i>Cork</i><par n="Barcelono__np"/></e>
<e lm="pliintensigi">    <i>pliintensig</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="telekontroli">    <i>telekontrol</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="Romano">          <i>Roman</i><par n="Mark/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Taylor">          <i>Taylor</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="elserĉi">         <i>elser</i><par n="ĉ"/><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="Viktoria">        <i>Viktoria</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Westminster">     <i>Westminster</i><par n="Barcelono__np"/></e>
<e lm="U.S.">            <i>U.S.</i><par n="Barcelono__np"/></e>
<e lm="U.K.">            <i>U.K.</i><par n="Barcelono__np"/></e>
<e>                      <i>Borg</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e>                      <i>Nejstgaard</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Belorusio">       <i>Belorus</i><par n="Afgan/io__np"/></e>
<e lm="Delavaro">        <i>Delavar</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Amerikoj">        <i>Amerikoj</i><par n="Andoj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Balkanoj">        <i>Balkanoj</i><par n="Andoj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bladimiro">       <i>Bladimiro</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Celestina">       <i>Celestina</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Elivio">          <i>Elivio</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Franco">          <i>Franco</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hernanda">        <i>Hernanda</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ivo">             <i>Ivo</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Lisa">            <i>Lisa</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Menelao">         <i>Menelao</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Quirina">         <i>Quirina</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ruiz">            <i>Ruiz</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
<e lm="Shea">            <i>Shea</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Yannice">         <i>Yannice</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bennett">         <i>Bennett</i><par n="Ifans__np"/></e>
<e lm="Matthews">        <i>Matthews</i><par n="Ifans__np"/></e>
<e lm="Roberts">         <i>Roberts</i><par n="Ifans__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mackenzie">       <i>Mackenzie</i><par n="Ifans__np"/></e>
<e lm="Cyfanswm">        <i>Cyfanswm</i><par n="Ifans__np"/></e>
<e lm="Francis">         <i>Francis</i><par n="James__np"/></e>
<e lm="Lucas">           <i>Lucas</i><par n="James__np"/></e>
<e lm="Charles">         <i>Charles</i><par n="James__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hercules">        <i>Hercules</i><par n="James__np"/></e>
<e lm="Tomas">           <i>Tomas</i><par n="James__np"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="proper_names"/></e>
